Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.017

Regulating agricultural commodities—Laws applicable.

This chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the comprehensively regulated agricultural industry.

(1) Other laws applicable to agricultural commodities include the following chapters and the rules adopted thereunder:

Chapter 15.08 RCW Horticultural pests and diseases;

Chapter 15.13 RCW Horticultural plants, Christmas trees, and facilities—Inspection and licensing;

Chapter 15.14 RCW Planting stock;

Chapter 15.15 RCW Certified seed potatoes;

Chapter 15.17 RCW Standards of grades and packs;

Chapter 15.19 RCW Certification and inspection of ginseng;

Chapter 15.30 RCW Controlled atmosphere storage of fruits and vegetables;

Chapter 15.49 RCW Seeds;

Chapter 15.53 RCW Commercial feed;

Chapter 15.54 RCW Fertilizers, minerals, and limes;

Chapter 15.58 RCW Washington pesticide control act;

Chapter 15.60 RCW Apiaries;

Chapter 15.64 RCW Farm marketing;

Chapter 15.83 RCW Agricultural marketing and fair practices;

Chapter 15.85 RCW Aquaculture marketing;

Chapter 15.86 RCW Organic products;

Chapter 15.92 RCW Center for sustaining agriculture and natural resources;

Chapter 15.130 RCW Food safety and security act;

Chapter 17.24 RCW Insect pests and plant diseases;

Chapter 19.94 RCW Weights and measures;

Chapter 20.01 RCW Agricultural products—Commission merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers, agents;

Chapter 22.09 RCW Agricultural commodities;

Chapter 69.07 RCW Washington food processing act;

Chapter 69.25 RCW Washington wholesome eggs and egg products act;

Chapter 69.28 RCW Honey;

7 U.S.C., section 136, Federal insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act.

(2) In addition to the laws and regulations listed in subsection (1) of this section that apply to the agricultural industry as a whole, the potato industry is regulated by or must comply with the following additional laws and the rules or regulations adopted thereunder:

(a) 7 C.F.R., Part 51, United States standards for grades of potatoes;

(b) 7 C.F.R., Part 946, Federal marketing order for Irish potatoes grown in Washington;

(c) 7 C.F.R., Part 1207, Potato research and promotion plan.

(3) In addition to the laws and regulations listed in subsection (1) of this section that apply to the agricultural industry as a whole, the wheat and barley industries are regulated by or must comply with the following additional laws and the rules adopted thereunder:

(a) 7 U.S.C., section 1621, Agricultural marketing act;

(b) Chapter 70A.15 RCW, Washington clean air act, agricultural burning.

(4) In addition to the laws and regulations listed in subsection (1) of this section that apply to the agricultural industry as a whole, the poultry industry is regulated by or must comply with the following additional laws and the rules adopted thereunder:

(a) 21 U.S.C., chapter 10, Poultry and poultry products inspection;

(b) 21 [7] U.S.C., chapter 9, Packers and stockyards;

(c) 7 U.S.C., section 1621, Agricultural marketing act;

(d) Washington fryer commission labeling standards.

[ 2021 c 65 s 11; 2018 c 236 s 707; 2011 c 103 s 26; 2002 c 313 s 41.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.